Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.330

Registration at designated agencies—Procedures.

(1) The secretary of state shall prescribe the method of voter registration for each designated agency. The agency shall use either the state voter registration by mail form with a separate declination form for the applicant to decline to register at this time, or the agency may use a separate form or process approved for use by the secretary of state.

(2) The person providing service at the agency shall offer voter registration services to every client at the time of application for service or assistance and with each renewal, recertification, or change of address. The person providing service shall give the applicant the same level of assistance with the voter registration application as is offered to fill out the agency's forms and documents, including information about age and citizenship requirements for voter registration.

(3)(a) The person providing service at the agency shall determine if the prospective applicant wants to register to vote or update the applicant's voter registration by asking the following question of all applicants age 16 or older:

"Do you want to register or sign up to vote or update your voter registration?"

(b) If the applicant chooses to register, sign up, or update a registration, the service agent shall ask the following:

"Are you a United States citizen?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative, the agent shall then provide the applicant with a voter registration form and instructions and shall record that the applicant has requested to sign up to vote, register to vote, or update a voter registration. If the applicant answers in the negative to the question, the agent shall not provide the applicant with a voter registration application.

(4) If an agency uses a computerized application process, it may, in consultation with the secretary of state, develop methods to capture simultaneously the information required for voter registration during a person's computerized application process.

(5) Each designated agency shall transmit the applications to the secretary of state or appropriate county auditor within three business days and must be received by the election official by the required voter registration deadline.

(6) Disclosure of information on individuals under the age of 18 is subject to RCW 29A.08.725.

[ 2023 c 466 s 11; 2023 c 361 s 5; 2020 c 208 s 5; 2019 c 391 s 6; 2018 c 109 s 18; 2013 c 11 s 16; 2009 c 369 s 20; 2005 c 246 s 14; 2003 c 111 s 224. Prior: 2001 c 41 s 7; 1994 c 57 s 28. Formerly RCW 29.07.440.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2023 c 361 s 5 and by 2023 c 466 s 11, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2023 c 466 ss 3, 4, 6, 11, 13-16, and 20-23: See note following RCW 29A.08.030.

Effective date—2020 c 208 ss 3, 5, 6, and 13-17: See note following RCW 29A.08.210.

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.